Missouri, session 2026, HB1898.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 173, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 173.1566, to read as follows:
173.1566. 1. Each public institution of higher education supported by state
funds shall allow students to use marijuana or marijuana-infused products for medical
use as authorized by state law on each campus of such institution.
2. The department of higher education and workforce development may
promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for the administration of this section.
Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created
under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies
with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested
with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date,
or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant
of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after the effective date of this
section shall be invalid and void.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.